District of Columbia statutes.
4-210.01

Right to hearing; notification of right.

An applicant for, or recipient of, public assistance aggrieved by the action or inaction of the Mayor shall be entitled to a hearing. Each applicant or recipient shall be notified of his or her rights to a hearing. Upon request for such hearing, reasonable notice of the time and place thereof shall be given to such applicant or recipient. Such hearing shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of this subchapter. The findings of the Mayor on any appeal shall be final.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 1001, 29 DCR 1060

History

1981 Ed., § 3-210.1.

Prior Codifications